Utah statutes.
62A-4a-117.   Performance monitoring system.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Performance goals" means a target level of performance or an expected
level of performance against which actual performance is compared.
(b)  "Performance indicators" means actual performance information regarding a
program or activity.
(c)  "Performance monitoring system" means a process to regularly collect and
analyze performance information including performance indicators and
performance goals.
(2)  On or before May 1, 1996, the director shall develop a performance
monitoring system of each area in the child welfare system, including foster
care and other substitute care, child protective services, and adoption.
(3)  On or before June 1, 1996, the director shall submit a description of
that monitoring system to the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel for
review.
(4)  The division shall fully implement a performance monitoring system on or
before October 1, 1996.
(5)  Before January 1 each year the director shall submit a written report
describing the difference between actual performance and performance goals for
the prior fiscal year to the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel and the
Joint Health and Human Services Appropriations Subcommittee.  The report shall
include:
(a)  a summary of the division's efforts during the prior fiscal year to
implement the Performance Milestone Plan;
(b)  a summary of how performance must be improved to achieve full
implementation of the Performance Milestone Plan;
(c)  data on the extent to which new and experienced division employees have
received training pursuant to statute and division policy; and
(d)  an analysis of the use and efficacy of family preservation services, both
before and after removal of children from their homes.
